Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-10] Enforcement of foreign
judgments. (a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c), if an action is
brought to enforce a judgment of another jurisdiction expressed in a foreign
money and the judgment is recognized in this State as enforceable, the enforcing
judgment must be entered as provided in section 658B-7 whether or not the
foreign judgment confers an option to pay in an equivalent amount of United
States dollars. A satisfaction or partial payment made upon the foreign
judgment, on proof thereof, must be credited against the amount of foreign
money specified in the judgment, notwithstanding the entry of judgment in this
State.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a foreign
judgment may be filed in accordance with any statute of this State providing a
procedure for its recognition and enforcement.

(c) A judgment entered on a foreign-money
claim only in United States dollars in another state must be enforced in this
State in United States dollars only. [L 1990, c 50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next